Washington statutes.
RCW 5.50.030

Validity of unsworn declaration—Exceptions.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, if a law of this state requires or permits use of a sworn declaration, an unsworn declaration meeting the requirements of this chapter has the same effect as a sworn declaration.

(2) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) A deposition;

(b) An oath of office;

(c) An oath required to be given before a specified official other than a notary public; or

(d) A declaration to be recorded pursuant to Title 64 or 65 RCW.

[ 2020 c 57 s 23; 2011 c 22 s 4.]